Utah statutes.
76-8-410.   Doing business without license.

Every person who commences or carries on any business, trade, profession, or calling, for the transaction or carrying on of which a license is required by any law, or by any county, city, or town ordinance, without taking out the license required by law or ordinance is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

